Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.116 is amended to read:
166.116. (1) A person commits the crime of interfering with public transportation if the person:
(a) Intentionally or knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in or on a public  transit vehicle or
public transit station;
(b) Intentionally or knowingly interferes with the provision  or use of public transportation ser-
vices by, among other things, interfering with the movement of, or access to, public transit  vehicles;
(c) While in or on a public transit vehicle or public transit station,  engages in disorderly con-
duct in the second degree as defined in ORS 166.025; [ or]
(d) Subjects  a public transportation passenger, employee, agent or security officer or transit
police officer to offensive physical contact[ .]; or
(e) While in or  on a public transit vehicle, knowingly ingests, inhales, ignites, injects or
otherwise consumes a controlled substance that is not lawfully possessed by the person.
(2)(a)(A) Interfering with public transportation as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this  section is
a Class C misdemeanor.
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph  (A) of this paragraph, interfering with public transportation
as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section is a Class A misdemeanor if the person  has three or
more prior convictions for interfering with public transportation as  provided in subsection (1)(a) of
this section.
(b) Interfering with public transportation as provided  in subsection (1)(b) to [ (d)] (e)  of this
section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Controlled substance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
[(a)] (b) “Enter or remain unlawfully” has the meaning given that term in ORS 164.205.
[(b)] (c)  “Public transit  station” includes all facilities, structures, lands and rights of way that
are owned, leased, held or used for the purposes of providing public transportation services.
[(c)] (d) “Public transit vehicle” means a vehicle that is  used for public transportation or oper-
ated by or under contract to any public body in order to provide public transportation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1553 (SB 1553-B) Page 1
[(d)] (e) “Public transportation” means transportation provided by  a city, county, special district
or any other political subdivision or municipal or public corporation.
SECTION 2.  ORS 423.478 is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations between sanctions, supervision,  services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, each county, in partnership with the department, shall assume re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions  and services for offenders convicted of felo-
nies, designated drug-related misdemeanors or designated person misdemeanors who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board  of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to  12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding the fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of  incarceration,
when an  offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county under ORS
137.124 (2) or (4), the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing  sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by the  supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and the  person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS 163A.010, the supervisory authority, as a condition of release,  shall order the
person to report to  the Department of State Police, a city police department or a county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries  on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have  the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of fentanyl under ORS 475.752 (8)(a);
(B) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(b);
(C) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(b);
(D) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(b);
(E) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 (2)(b);
(F) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(b); [ or]
(G) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(b)[ .]; or
(H) Interfering with public transportation under ORS 166.116 (1)(e).
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in the fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment  document is as
described in ORS 163.160 (4);
Enrolled Senate Bill 1553 (SB 1553-B) Page 2
(B) Menacing constituting domestic  violence if the judgment document is as described in ORS
163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
Passed by Senate February 21, 2024
Repassed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1553 (SB 1553-B) Page 3